Hawaii statutes.
§489-8 Civil penalty. (a) It shall be
unlawful for a person to discriminate unfairly in public accommodations.

(b) Any person, firm, company, association, or
corporation who violates this part shall be fined a sum of not less than $500
nor more than $10,000 for each violation, which sum shall be collected in a
civil action brought by the attorney general or the civil rights commission on
behalf of the State. The penalties provided in this section shall be
cumulative to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this
State. Each day of violation under this part shall be a separate violation.

(c) This section shall not apply to violations
of part II of this chapter. [L 1987, c 294, §1; am L 1989, c 386, §12; am L
2000, c 227, §6; am L 2001, c 55, §24]

Rules of Court

Class actions, see HRCP
rule 23; injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next